Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 3.3
Electric Vehicle Charging Stations

31-3.3-1.
Accessibility of charging stations for electric vehicles.

The department of transportation, along with the division of motor vehicles and the office of energy resources, shall develop, no later than January 1, 2022, a plan for a statewide electric vehicle charging station infrastructure in order to make
electric vehicle charging stations more accessible to the public.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 389, § 1, effective July 13, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 390, § 1, effective July 13, 2021.